Mississippi, session 2026, HB918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-35-309, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-35-309.  (1)  The Department of Revenue shall, if practicable, on or before the first Monday of June of each year, make out for each person, firm, company or corporation listed in Section 27-35-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, an assessment of the company's property, both real and personal, tangible and intangible.  The Department of Revenue shall apportion the assessment of value of each company's property according to the provisions of this article, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, as follows: (a)  When the property of such public service company is located in more than one (1) county in this state, the Department of Revenue shall direct the company to apportion the assessed value between the counties and municipalities and all other taxing districts therein, in the proportion which the property located therein bears to the entire value of the property of such company as valued by the department, so that to each county, municipality and taxing district therein, there shall be apportioned such part of the entire valuation as will fairly equalize the relative value of the property therein located to the whole value thereof. (b)  When the property of such public utility required to be assessed by the provisions of this article is located in more than one (1) state, the assessed value thereof shall be apportioned by the Department of Revenue in such manner as will fairly and equitably determine the principal sum for the value thereof in this state, and after ascertaining such value it shall be apportioned by them as herein provided. The assessment roll shall contain all the property of any such public service company, railroad, person, firm or corporation and the value thereof, and so made that each county, municipality, and taxing district shall receive its just share of taxes proportionately to the amount of property therein situated. (2)  (a)  The assessment when made shall remain open for twenty (20) days in the Office of the Department of Revenue, and be for such time subject to the objections thereto which may be filed with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals; but real estate belonging to railroads and which forms no part of the road, and is wholly disconnected from its railroad business, shall not be assessed by the Department of Revenue, but shall be assessed as other real estate is assessed by the tax assessor of the county where situated. (b)  The apportionment of the assessed value as required by this section shall be filed with the Department of Revenue by such public service company on or before the last day of the objection period established in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). If such company shall fail, refuse or neglect to render the apportionment of assessed value as required by this section, such company shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Section 27-35-305.  The filing of an objection by such public service company shall not preclude such company from filing the property apportionment as required by this section. (3)  Any nuclear generating plant which is located in the state, which is owned or operated by a public utility rendering electric service within the state and not exempt from ad valorem taxation under any other statute and which is not owned or operated by an instrumentality of the federal government shall be exempt from county, municipal and district ad valorem taxes.  In lieu of the payment of county, municipal and district ad valorem taxes, such public utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum based on the assessed value of such nuclear generating plant in an amount to be determined and distributed as follows: (a)  The Department of Revenue shall annually assign an assessed value to any nuclear generating plant described in this subsection in the same manner as for ad valorem tax purposes by using accepted industry methods for appraising and assessing public utility property.  The assessed value assigned shall be used for the purpose of determining the in-lieu tax due under this section and shall not be included on the ad valorem tax rolls of the situs taxing authority nor be subject to ad valorem taxation by the situs taxing authority nor shall the assessed value assigned be used in determining the debt limit of the situs taxing authority. However, the assessed value so assigned may be used by the situs taxing authority for the purpose of determining salaries of its public officials. (b)  On or before February 1, 1987, for the 1986 taxable year and on or before February 1 of each year through the 1989 taxable year, such utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum equal to two percent (2%) of the assessed value as ascertained by the Department of Revenue, but such payment shall not be less than Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for any of the four (4) taxable years; all such payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for these four (4) taxable years shall be paid into the General Fund of the state.  On or before February 1, 1991, for the 1990 taxable year and on or before February 1 of each year thereafter through the 2026 taxable year, such utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum equal to two percent (2%) of the assessed value as ascertained by the Department of Revenue, but such payment shall not be less than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) for any taxable year for as long as such nuclear power plant is licensed to operate and is not being permanently decommissioned; all such payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for taxable years 1990 and thereafter through taxable year 2026, shall be paid as follows: (i)  An amount of Three Million Forty Thousand Dollars ($3,040,000.00) annually, beginning with fiscal year 1991 and ending with fiscal year 2026, shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to Claiborne County.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County for any purpose for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321. However, should the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County withdraw its support of the Grand Gulf Nuclear Station off-site emergency plan or otherwise fail to satisfy its off-site emergency plan commitments as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) annually of the funds designated for Claiborne County as described by this * * *subsection subparagraph (i) shall be deposited in the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Fund as provided in Section 33-15-51. (ii)  An amount of One Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($160,000.00) annually, beginning with fiscal year 1991 and ending with fiscal year 2026, shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to the City of Port Gibson, Mississippi.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Aldermen of the City of Port Gibson for any purpose for which a municipality is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321.  However, should the Board of Aldermen of the City of Port Gibson withdraw its support of the Grand Gulf Nuclear Station off-site emergency plan or otherwise fail to satisfy its off-site emergency plan commitment, as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) annually of the funds designated for the City of Port Gibson as described by this * * *subsection subparagraph (ii) shall be deposited in the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Fund as provided in Section 33-15-51. (iii)  The remaining balance of the payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) annually, less amounts transferred under (i) and (ii) of this subsection, beginning with fiscal year 1991 and ending with fiscal year 2026, shall be allocated in accordance with subsection (3)(f) of this section. On or before February 1, 2027, for the 2026 taxable year and on or before February 1 of each year thereafter, such utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum equal to two percent (2%) of the assessed value as ascertained by the Department of Revenue, but such payment shall not be more than Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00) for any taxable year for as long as such nuclear power plant is licensed to operate and is not being permanently decommissioned; all such payments shall be paid as follows: (i) An amount equal to forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to Claiborne County.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County for any purpose for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321. However, should the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County withdraw its support of the Grand Gulf Nuclear Station off-site emergency plan or otherwise fail to satisfy its off-site emergency plan commitments as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) annually of the funds designated for Claiborne County as described by this subparagraph (i) shall be deposited in the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Fund as provided in Section 33-15-51. (ii)  An amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of such payment shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue and apportioned equally and paid to adjacent counties.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of any adjacent county for any purpose for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321.  For the purposes of this provision, "adjacent county" means any county in the State of Mississippi that shares a common boundary with Claiborne County. (iii)  An amount equal to forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to remaining counties in this state wherein such public utility renders electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year.  For the purposes of this provision, "remaining county" means any county in the State of Mississippi other than Claiborne County and adjacent counties. (c)  Pursuant to certification by the Attorney General to the State Treasurer and the Department of Revenue that the suit against the State of Mississippi pending on the effective date of House Bill 8, First Extraordinary Session of 1990, [Laws, 1990 Ex Session, Ch. 12, eff June 26, 1990], in the Chancery Court for the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, styled Albert Butler et al v. the Mississippi State Tax Commission et al, has been voluntarily dismissed with prejudice as to all plaintiffs at the request of the complainants and that no attorney's fees or court costs have been assessed against the state and each of the parties, including Claiborne County and each municipality and school district located in the county, have signed and delivered to the Attorney General a full and complete release in favor of the State of Mississippi and its elected officials of all claims that have been asserted or may be asserted in the suit pending on the effective date of House Bill 8, First Extraordinary Session of 1990, [Laws, 1990 Ex Session, Ch. 12, eff June 26, 1990], in the Chancery Court for the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, styled Albert Butler et al v. the Mississippi State Tax Commission et al, and the deposit into the State General Fund of in-lieu payments and interest thereon due the state under subsection (3)(b) of this section but placed in escrow because of the lawsuit described above, the state shall promptly transfer to the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County out of the State General Fund an amount of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) which shall be a one-time distribution to Claiborne County from the state.  Such payment may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes for the 1991 fiscal year under Sections 27-39-321 and 27-39-305. (d)  After distribution of the one-time payment to Claiborne County as set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the Department of Revenue upon certification that the pending lawsuit as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section has been voluntarily dismissed shall promptly deposit an amount of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) into the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund as provided for in Section 33-15-51, which shall be a one-time payment, to be utilized in accordance with the provisions of such section. (e)  After distribution of the one-time payment to Claiborne County as set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section and the payment to the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund as set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section, the Department of Revenue upon certification that the pending lawsuit as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section has been voluntarily dismissed shall promptly distribute ten percent (10%) of the remainder of the prior payments remaining in escrow to the General Fund of the state and the balance of the prior payments remaining in escrow shall be distributed to the counties and municipalities in this state wherein such public utility has rendered electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county, excluding municipalities therein, and in each municipality, for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year.  The payments distributed to the counties and municipalities under this paragraph (e) may be expended by such counties and municipalities for any lawful purpose and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-321 and 27-39-305. (f)  After distribution of the payments for fiscal year 1991 as set forth in Section 19-9-151 and distribution of the payments as provided for in subsection (3)(b) of this section, and ending with fiscal year 2026, the Department of Revenue shall distribute ten percent (10%) of the remainder of the payments to the General Fund of the state and the balance to the counties and municipalities in this state wherein such public utility renders electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county, excluding municipalities therein, and in each municipality for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year. (g)  No county, including municipalities therein, shall receive in excess of twenty percent (20%) of the funds distributed under paragraph (f) of this subsection. (h)  The revenues received by counties and municipalities under paragraph (f) of this subsection shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321. SECTION 2.  Section 19-9-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-151.  The in-lieu payments made to the State Tax Commission pursuant to Section 27-35-309(3)(b), excluding payments made in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) which are required to be paid into the General Fund of the state, shall be distributed by the State Tax Commission as follows: (a)  For fiscal year 1987, fifty percent (50%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (b)  For fiscal year 1988, forty-five percent (45%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (c)  For fiscal year 1989, forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (d)  For fiscal year 1990, thirty-five (35%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (e)  For fiscal year 1991 and thereafter, thirty percent (30%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located. SECTION 3.  Section 19-9-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-153.  Of the funds received pursuant to Section 19-9-151 by a situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located, the board of supervisors of such situs county shall distribute ten percent (10%) of each payment, upon receipt, to the most populous incorporated municipality within the county; however, if such plant is located within a municipality, such payments which would otherwise be made to the situs county pursuant to Section 19-9-151 shall be divided equally between the situs county and situs municipality. SECTION 4.  Section 19-9-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-155.  Of the funds retained by the situs county after the payment made pursuant to Section 19-9-153, not more than Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) per year may be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax, and any funds in excess of such amount shall be expended in accordance with Section 19-9-157. SECTION 5.  Section 19-9-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-9-157.  The board of supervisors of the situs county, upon receipt of the payments pursuant to Section 19-9-151 less the payment made according to Section 19-9-153, shall pay all such funds in excess of Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) to the governing authorities of the public school districts in such county in the proportion that the net enrollment for the preceding scholastic year of each school district bears to the total net enrollment of the county for the preceding scholastic year.  Such funds may be expended only for the purposes of capital improvements to school facilities and only after plans therefor have been submitted to and approved by the State Board of Education.  The governing authorities of such school districts may borrow money in anticipation of receipt of payments pursuant to this section and the levying authority for the school district may issue negotiable notes therefor, for the purposes set forth herein.  Such loan shall be repaid from the payments received under this section by the governing authorities of the public school district. However, no public school districts within the situs county shall be entitled to any payments after January 1, 1990. SECTION 6.  Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair, amend, or conflict with Section 112, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, and the Nuclear In-Lieu tax shall remain a state-imposed tax in lieu of ad valorem taxation. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.